North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-02.3 Limitation of Abortion

14-02.3-01.
State policy on abortion and childbirth — Use of public funds restricted.

Between normal childbirth and abortion, it is the policy of the state of North Dakota that normal childbirth is to be given preference, encouragement, and support by law and by state action, it being in the best interests of the well-being and common good of North Dakota citizens.

An agency of this state may not produce, distribute, publish, disseminate, endorse, or approve materials of any type that, between normal childbirth and abortion, do not give preference, encouragement, and support to normal childbirth. An agency of the state may not fund, endorse, or support any program that, between normal childbirth and abortion, does not give preference, encouragement, and support to normal childbirth.

No funds of this state or any agency, county, municipality, or any other subdivision thereof and no federal funds passing through the state treasury or a state agency may be used to pay for the performance, or for promoting the performance, of an abortion unless the abortion is necessary to prevent the death of the woman.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 192, § 1; 2011, ch. 109, § 11.

14-02.3-02.
Use of public funds for family planning — Use for the performance, referral, and encouragement of abortion prohibited.

No funds of this state or any agency, county, municipality, or any other subdivision thereof and no federal funds passing through the state treasury or a state agency may be used as family planning funds by any person or public or private agency which performs, refers, or encourages abortion.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 192, § 2.

Note.

This section has been held partially unconstitutional, see Constitutionality note, below.

14-02.3-03.
Payment for abortions by health insurance policies delivered or issued in North Dakota restricted.

No health insurance contracts, plans, or policies delivered or issued for delivery in this state may provide coverage for abortions, including the elimination of one or more unborn children in a multifetal pregnancy, except by an optional rider for which there must be paid an additional premium. Provided, however, that this section does not apply to the performance of an abortion necessary to prevent the death of the woman.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 192, § 3; 2011, ch. 109, § 12.

14-02.3-04.
Abortion in government hospitals operated within North Dakota restricted.

No person may authorize or perform an abortion in a hospital owned, maintained, or operated within the state by the state or any of its agencies or by any political subdivision of the state, unless the abortion is necessary to prevent the death of the woman.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 192, § 4.

14-02.3-05.
Penalty.

Any person found guilty of violating this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 192, § 5.

Note.

Section 6, chapter 192, S.L. 1979, provides:

“Should any provision, section, clause, or word of this Act be construed by any court of law to be invalid, illegal, unconstitutional, or otherwise unenforcible, such invalidity, illegality, unconstitutionality, or unenforcibility shall not extend to any other provision or provisions of this Act.

“It is the express intent of this legislature to enact legislation that is constitutional. A reviewing court, therefore, is requested to set forth clearly the grounds upon which any provision of this Act is declared invalid so that appropriate remedial legislation may be enacted.”